District of Columbia statutes.
50-1505.04

Mayor to make rules and regulations.

The Mayor is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

History

Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-157, § 7, 25 DCR 6995

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-114.
1973 Ed., § 40-114.